Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.325

School seismic safety grant program account.

The school seismic safety grant program account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from direct appropriations from the legislature or moneys directed to the account from any other source must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. The account is intended to fund projects using tax exempt bonds. Expenditures from the account are for the school seismic safety grant program.

[ 2022 c 113 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2022 c 113: See note following RCW 28A.525.320.